ru: Характеристики дрона: Вращение камеры на 360 градусов; Регулируемая скорость; Удержание высоты; Автоматический взлет и посадка; Автономные режимы полета; Встроенная камера; Вид от первого лица; Складной; Режим «Следуй за мной»; Поддержка GPS; Геозонирование; Безголовый режим; Прямая трансляция видео; Длительный срок службы батареи; Дальний контроль; Ночное видение; Избегание препятствий; Удержание позиции; Готовность к полетам; Возврат домой; Тепловизор; Навигация по точкам; Другой
lt-LT: Dronų ypatybės: 360 laipsnių kameros pasukimas; Reguliuojamas greitis; Aukščio palaikymas; Automatinis kilimas ir nusileidimas; Autonominiai skrydžio režimai; Įmontuota kamera; Pirmojo asmens vaizdas; Sulankstomas; Sekimo režimas; GPS palaikymas; Geozonos; Bekryptis režimas; Tiesioginis vaizdo srautas; Ilgas akumuliatoriaus veikimo laikas; Ilgo nuotolio valdymas; Naktinis matymas; Kliūčių vengimas; Padėties palaikymas; Paruoštas skristi; Grįžimas į pradinę padėtį; Šiluminė vaizdo kamera; „Waypoint“ navigacija; Kita
cs: Vlastnosti dronu: Otáčení kamery o 360 stupňů; Nastavitelná rychlost; Držení nadmořské výšky; Automatický vzlet a přistání; Autonomní letové režimy; Vestavěná kamera; Řízení z pohledu pilota; Skládací; Sledovací režim; Podpora GPS; Geofencing; Režim kompasu; Živý přenos videa; Dlouhá životnost baterie; Ovládání na velkou vzdálenost; Noční vidění; Vyhýbání se překážkám; Držení pozice; Připravenost k letu; Návrat do výchozí pozice; Termokamera; Navigace podle souřadnic GPS; Jiné
tr: Drone özellikleri: 360 derece dönebilen kamera; Ayarlanabilir hız; İrtifayı kilitleme sistemi; Otomatik kalkış ve iniş; Otonom uçuş modları; Dahili kamera; Birinci şahıs görüşü; Katlanabilir; Beni takip et modu; GPS desteği; Coğrafi sınır; Başsız modu; Canlı video akışı; Uzun pil ömrü; Uzun menzilli kontrol; Gece görüşü; Engellerden kaçınma; Pozisyon sabitleme; Uçmaya hazır; Eve dönüş; Termal görüntüleme kamerası; Ara nokta navigasyonu; Diğer
de: Drohnenfunktionen: 360-Grad-Kameras; Einstellbare Geschwindigkeit; Altitude hold; Automatischer Start/Landung; Automatischer Flugmodus; Eingebaute Kamera; First Person View; Klappbar; Follow-Me-Modus; GPS-Unterstützung; Geofencing; Headless-Modus; Live-Videofeed; Lange Batterielebensdauer; Kontrolle über große Entfernungen; Nachtsicht; Hindernisvermeidung; Position halten; Bereit zum Fliegen; Rückkehrfunktion; Wärmebildkamera; Wegpunktnavigation; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Vlastnosti dronu: Otáčanie kamery o 360 stupňov; Nastaviteľná rýchlosť; Udržiavanie nadmorskej výšky; Automatický vzlet a pristátie; Autonómne letové režimy; Vstavaná kamera; Pohľad prvej osoby; Sklopný; Režim Nasleduj ma; Podpora GPS; Geofencing; Režim jednoduchého ovládania; Živý video prenos; Dlhá výdrž batérie; Ovládanie s dlhým dosahom; Nočné videnie; Vyhýbanie sa prekážkam; Udržiavanie pozície; Pripravený na let; Návrat domov; Termovízna kamera; Navigácia po trasových bodoch; Iné
th: คุณสมบัติของโดรน: การหมุนกล้อง 360 องศา; ปรับความเร็วได้; การรักษาระดับความสูง; ขึ้นและจอดอัตโนมัติ; โหมดการบินอัตโนมัติ; มีกล้องในตัว; มุมมองบุคคลที่หนึ่ง; แบบพับได้; โหมดติดตามฉัน; รองรับ GPS; การกำหนดตำแหน่งทางภูมิศาสตร์; โหมดไร้หัว; ฟีดวิดีโอสด; อายุการใช้งานแบตเตอรี่ยาวนาน; การควบคุมพิสัยไกล; การมองเห็นตอนกลางคืน; การหลีกเลี่ยงสิ่งกีดขวาง; การยึดตำแหน่ง; พร้อมบิน; กลับหน้าแรก; กล้องถ่ายภาพความร้อน; การนำทางจุดอ้างอิง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 无人机功能: 360 度摄像头旋转; 可调速度; 高度保持; 自主起降; 自主飞行模式; 内置摄像头; 第一人称视角; 可折叠; 跟随模式; 支持 GPS; 地理围栏; 无头模式; 实时视频传输; 长续航电池; 长距离控制; 夜视; 避障; 位置保持; 即插即飞; 返航; 热成像摄像头; 航点导航; 其他
pt-BR: Características do drone: Rotação de câmera de 360 graus; Velocidade ajustável; Manutenção de altitude; Decolagem e pouso automáticos; Modos de voo autônomo; Câmera integrada; Visão em primeira pessoa; Dobrável; Modo Follow me; Compatível com GPS; Geofencing; Modo headless; Transmissão de vídeo ao vivo; Bateria de longa duração; Controle de longo alcance; Visão noturna; Desvio de obstáculos; Retenção de altitude; Ready to fly (RTF); Return to home (RTH); Câmera termográfica de diagnóstico; Navegação por waypoint; Outro
ja: ドローンの特徴: 360度カメラ回転; スピード調整可能; 高度維持; 自動離着陸; 自律飛行Mode*; 内蔵カメラ; 一人称視点; 折りたたみ式; フォローミーMode*; GPSサポート; ジオフェンシング; ヘッドレスMode*; ライブビデオフィード; 長いバッテリー寿命; 長距離制御; 暗視; 障害物回避; ポジションホールド; 飛行準備完了; 家に帰る; 赤外線サーモグラフィ; ウェイポイントナビゲーション; その他
ro-RO: Caracteristici dronă: Rotire cameră la 360°; Viteză reglabilă; Menținerea altitudinii; Decolare și aterizare automate; Moduri de zbor autonome; Cameră încorporată; Perspectivă first person; Pliabilă; Mod Urmărire; Suport GPS; Geofencing; Mod Headless; Flux video live; Autonomie mare baterie; Control pe distanță lungă; Vedere nocturnă; Evitarea obstacolelor; Menținerea poziției; Gata de zbor; Revenire acasă; Cameră video cu termoviziune; Navigare puncte de trecere; Altele
zh-TW: 無人機特色: 360 度相機迴轉; 速度可調; 高度維持; 自動起降; 自動飛行模式; 內建相機; 第一人稱視角; 可折疊; 跟隨模式; 支援 GPS; 地理圍籬; 無頭模式; 現場視訊直播; 電池壽命長; 遠距控制; 夜視; 避障; 位置維持; 即可飛行; 返回; 熱像相機; 航點導航; 其他
pt-PT: Características do drone: Rotação de câmara de 360 graus; Velocidade ajustável; Mantém altitude; Descolagem e aterragem automáticos; Modos de voo autónomo; Câmara integrada; Visão em primeira pessoa; Dobrável; Modo Segue-me; Suporte de GPS; Delimitação geográfica; Modo sem cabeça; Transmissão de vídeo em direto; Bateria de longa duração; Controlo de longo alcance; Visão noturna; Desvio de obstáculos; Posição mantida; Pronto para voar; Voltar para casa; Câmara termográfica; Navegação por pontos de passagem; Outro
el: Χαρακτηριστικά drone: Περιστροφή κάμερας 360 μοιρών; Ρυθμιζόμενη ταχύτητα; Διατήρηση υψομέτρου; Αυτόματη απογείωση & προσγείωση; Αυτόνομες λειτουργίες πτήσης; Ενσωματωμένη κάμερα; Προβολή πρώτου προσώπου; Αναδιπλούμενο; Λειτουργία ακολούθησέ με; Υποστήριξη GPS; Γεωπερίφραξη; Λειτουργία χωρίς κεφαλή; Ζωντανή ροή βίντεο; Μεγάλη διάρκεια ζωής μπαταρίας; Έλεγχος μεγάλης εμβέλειας; Νυχτερινή όραση; Αποφυγή εμποδίων; Διατήρηση θέσης; Έτοιμο για πτήση; Επιστροφή στο σπίτι; Κάμερα θερμικής απεικόνισης; Πλοήγηση μέσω σημείων αναφοράς; Άλλο
sv: Drönarens funktioner: 360-graders kamerarotation; Justerbar hastighet; Höjdhållning; Automatisk start och landning; Autonoma flyglägen; Inbyggd kamera; Förstapersonsvy; Vikbar; Följ mig-läge; GPS-stöd; Geofencing; Huvudlöst läge; Direktsänd video; Lång batteritid; Långdistanskontroll; Nattseende; Undvikande av hinder; Positionshållning; Flygklar; Återgång till hemmet; Värmekamera; Vägpunktsnavigering; Övrigt
hr-HR: Značajke drona: Rotacija kamere od 360 stupnjeva; Podesiva brzina; Zadržavanje visine; Automatsko polijetanje i slijetanje; Autonomni načini letenja; Ugrađena kamera; Pogled iz prvog lica; Sklopivo; Način za praćenje subjekta; Podrška za GPS; Geoograda; Headless način rada; Videoprijenos uživo; Dugotrajna baterija; Kontrola dugog dometa; Noćni vid; Izbjegavanje prepreka; Zadržavanje položaja; Spremno za letenje; Povratak na polaznu točku; Termovizijska kamera; Navigacija putnim točkama; Ostalo
nb: Dronefunksjoner: 360 graders kamerarotasjon; Regulerbar hastighet; Høydeholder; Automatisk avgang og landing; Selvstyrte flymoduser; Innebygd kamera; Førstepersonsvisning; Sammenleggbar; Følg-meg-modus; GPS-støtte; Geofencing; Hodeløs modus; Direkte videooverføring; Lang batteritid; Langdistansekontroll; Nattsyn; Unngåelse av hindringer; Posisjonsholder; Klar til å fly; Vend tilbake til hjem; Termisk kamera; Veipunktsnavigering; Annet
fi: Droonin ominaisuudet: 360 asteen kameran kierto; Säädettävä nopeus; Korkeuden pito; Automaattinen nousu ja lasku; Autonomiset lentotilat; Sisäänrakennettu kamera; Ensimmäisen henkilön näkymä; Taitettava; Seuraa minua -tila; GPS-tuettu; Geoaidat; Headless-tila; Live-videosyöte; Pitkä akunkesto; Pitkän kantaman ohjaus; Yönäkö; Esteiden välttäminen; Asennon pito; Valmis lentämään; Paluu kotiin; Lämpökuvauskamera; Reittipisteen navigointi; Muu
nl: Drone-functies: Camerarotatie van 360 graden; Instelbare snelheid; Hoogte vasthouden; Automatisch opstijgen en landen; Autonome vliegmodi; Ingebouwde camera; Eerste-persoonsperspectief; Inklapbaar; Volg mij-modus; GPS-ondersteuning; Geofencing; Headless modus; Live-videofeed; Batterij met lange levensduur; Besturing op lange afstand; Night vision; Vermijden van obstakels; Positie vasthouden; Klaar voor de vlucht; Terugkeren naar huis; Warmtebeeldcamera; WayPoint-navigatie; Andere
ko: 드론 기능: 360도 카메라 회전; 조절식 속도; 고도 유지; 자동 이륙 및 착륙; 자율 비행 모드; 내장 카메라; 1인칭 시점; 접이식; 팔로우 미 모드; GPS 지원; 지오펜싱; 헤드리스 모드; 라이브 비디오 피드; 긴 배터리 수명; 장거리 제어; 야간 시야; 장애물 회피; 포지션 유지; 비행 준비 완료; 리턴 투 홈; 열 화상 카메라; 웨이포인트 탐색; 기타
fr: Caractéristiques du drone: Rotation de la caméra à 360 degrés; Vitesse réglable; Maintien de l'altitude; Décollage et atterrissage automatiques; Modes de vol autonome; Caméra intégrée; Vue à la première personne; Pliable; Mode Suivez-moi; Prise en charge du GPS; Géorepérage; Mode sans tête; Flux vidéo en direct; Batterie à longue durée de vie; Contrôle à longue portée; Vision nocturne; Évitement d'obstacles; Maintien de la position; Prêt à voler; Retour à la maison; Caméra thermique; Navigation par points de cheminement; Autre
it: Caratteristiche del drone: Rotazione della telecamera a 360 gradi; Velocità regolabile; Mantenimento dell'altitudine; Decollo e atterraggio automatici; Modalità di volo autonome; Fotocamera incorporata; Visuale in prima persona; Pieghevole; Modalità Seguimi; Supporto GPS; Geofencing; Headless mode; Feed video in diretta; Durata lunga della batteria; Controllo a lungo raggio; Visione notturna; Evitamento degli ostacoli; Mantenimento della posizione; Pronto a volare; Ritorna a casa; Telecamera termografica; Navigazione waypoint; Altro
en: Drone features: 360-degree camera rotation; Adjustable speed; Altitude hold; Auto takeoff & land; Autonomous flight modes; Built-in camera; First person view; Foldable; Follow me mode; GPS support; Geofencing; Headless mode; Live video feed; Long battery life; Long range control; Night vision; Obstacle avoidance; Position hold; Ready to fly; Return to home; Thermal imaging camera; Waypoint navigation; Other
vi: Tính năng máy quay trên không: Xoay camera 360 độ; Điều chỉnh được tốc độ; Giữ độ cao; Tự động cất cánh và hạ cánh; Chế độ bay tự động; Camera tích hợp; Góc nhìn người thứ nhất; Có thể gập lại; Chế độ theo dõi tôi; Hỗ trợ GPS; Rào địa lý; Chế độ không đầu; Nguồn cấp video trực tiếp; Thời lượng pin lâu; Kiểm soát tầm xa; Quan sát ban đêm; Tránh chướng ngại vật; Giữ vị trí; Sẵn sàng bay; Trở về đích; Camera ảnh nhiệt; Định hướng theo lộ điểm; Khác
da: Dronefunktioner: 360-graders kamerarotation; Justerbar hastighed; Højdehold; Automatisk start og landing; Autonome flyvetilstande; Indbygget kamera; Førstepersonvisning; Sammenfoldelig; Følg mig-tilstand; GPS-support; Geofencing; Headless-tilstand; Livevideofeed; Lang batterilevetid; Styring med lang rækkevidde; Nattesyn; Undgåelse af forhindringer; Hold position; Klar til at flyve; Vend hjem; Termisk kamera; Navigation efter vartegn; Andet
hu: Drónjellemzők: 360 fokban forgatható kamera; Állítható sebesség; Magasság tartása; Automatikus fel- és leszállás; Autonóm repülési módok; Beépített kamera; Első személyű nézet; Összehajtható; Kövess engem mód; GPS-támogatás; Geofencing; Fej nélküli mód; Élő videótovábbítás; Hosszú akkumulátor-élettartam; Nagy hatótávolságú vezérlés; Éjjellátó; Akadályok elkerülése; Pozíció tartása; Repülésre kész; Vissza a kiindulási helyre; Hőkamera; Útvonalpont-navigáció; Egyéb
es: Características del dron: Rotación de cámara de 360 grados; Velocidad regulable; Altitud sostenida; Despegue y aterrizaje automático; Modos de vuelo autónomo; Cámara integrada; Vista en primera persona; Plegable; Modo Sígueme; Compatible con GPS; Geocercado; Modo Sin cabeza; Transmisión de video en vivo; Batería de larga duración; Control de largo alcance; Visión nocturna; Evasión de obstáculos; Posición sostenida; Preparado para volar; Vuelta a casa; Cámara termográfica; Navegación por puntos de referencia; Otros
sl-SI: Lastnosti brezpilotnega letala: 360-stopinjsko vrtenje kamere; Nastavljiva hitrost; Zadrževanje višine; Avtomatski vzlet in pristanek; Avtonomni načini letenja; Vgrajena kamera; Prvoosebni pogled; Zložljiva; Način "Sledi mi"; GPS-podpora; Geofencing; Brezglavi način; Video vir v živo; Dolga življenjska doba baterije; Nadzor na velike razdalje; Nočni vid; Izogibanje oviram; Zadrževanje položaja; Pripravljeno za letenje; Vrnitev domov; Termovizijska kamera; Navigacija po točkah poti; Drugo
bg-BG: Характеристики на дрон: Въртене на камерата на 360 градуса; Регулируема скорост; Задържане на надморска височина; Автоматично излитане и кацане; Автономни режими на полет; Вградена камера; Изглед от първо лице; Сгъваем; Режим „Следвай ме“; Поддръжка на GPS; Определяне на географски координати; Режим без глава; Видео емисия на живо; Дълъг живот на батерията; Управление на дълги разстояния; Нощно виждане; Избягване на препятствия; Задържане на позиция; Готов за полет; Връщане у дома; Термовизионна камера; Навигация по точки; Други
pl: Charakterystyka drona: Obrót kamery o 360 stopni; Regulowana prędkość; Utrzymywanie wysokości; Automatyczny start i lądowanie; Autonomiczne tryby lotu; Wbudowana kamera; Widok pierwszej osoby; Składane; Tryb „Podążaj za mną”; Obsługa GPS; Geofencing; Tryb headless; Transmisja wideo na żywo; Długi czas pracy na baterii; Kontrola dalekiego zasięgu; Widoczność w nocy; Omijanie przeszkód; Utrzymanie pozycji; Gotowość do lotu; Powrót do domu; Kamera termowizyjna; Nawigacja według punktów orientacyjnych; Inne